California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Hospitals or groups of hospitals with which a contract has been entered into pursuant to this article shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of carrying out the contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 44.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Contracts for Medi-Cal Services and Case Management [14087.3. - 14087.48.]

14087.3.

(a) The director may contract, on a bid or nonbid basis, with any qualified individual, organization, or entity to provide services to, arrange for or case manage the care of Medi-Cal beneficiaries. At the director’s discretion, the contract may be exclusive or nonexclusive, statewide or on a more limited geographic basis, and include provisions to do the following:

(1) Perform targeted case management of selected services or beneficiary populations where it is expected that
 case management will reduce program expenditures.

(2) Provide for delivery of services in a manner consistent with managed care principles, techniques, and practices directed at ensuring the most cost-effective and appropriate scope, duration, and level of care.

(3) Provide for alternate methods of payment, including, but not limited to, a prospectively negotiated reimbursement rate, fee-for-service, retainer, capitation, shared savings, volume discounts, lowest bid price, negotiated price, rebates, or other basis.

(4) Secure services directed at any or all of the following:

(A) Recruiting and organizing providers to care for Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(B) Designing and implementing fiscal or
 other incentives for providers to participate in the Medi-Cal program in cost-effective ways.

(C) Linking beneficiaries with cost-effective providers.

(5) Provide for:

(A) Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) to share in the efficiencies and economies realized by those contracts.

(B) Effective coordination between contractors operating under this article and Medi-Cal managed care plans in the management of health care provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(6) Permit individual physicians, groups of physicians, or other providers to participate in a manner that supports the organized system mode of operation.

(7) Encourage group practices with relationships with hospitals having low unit costs.

(b) The director may require individual physicians, groups of physicians, or other providers as a condition of participation under the Medi-Cal program, to enter into capitated contracts pursuant to this section in order to correct or prevent irregular or abusive billing practices. No physician, groups of physicians, or other providers shall be reimbursed for services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries if the physician, group of physicians, or other providers has declined to enter into a contract required by the director pursuant to this section.

(c) The department shall seek federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation under this section.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the department shall determine preliminary per capita rates of payment for services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in a managed care program contracting in areas specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program under this section, or Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, or 14087.96. The department shall provide to each managed care plan the preliminary contract rates and source documents at least 60 days prior to the effective date of each new rate period.

(2) On or before June 1, 1999, the department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the managed care plans subject to paragraph (1) regarding the development of capitation rates. This memorandum of understanding, which is intended to ensure that capitation rates become effective in a timely manner and remain stable throughout
 the rate year, shall establish all of the following:

(A) A process and timetable for the managed care plans to review and comment on any modifications in the rate development methodology.

(B) A process and timetable for managed care plans to provide comments on the draft rates.

(C) A process and timetable for the department to respond to managed care plan comments on the draft rates.

(D) A process and timetable to managed care finalize capitation rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 834, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.301.

When entering into contracts with health care service plans that provide comprehensive dental benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries on an at-risk basis, the department may require that the health care service plans pay for the costs of the administrative and regulatory oversight required to monitor the contract compliance terms of the agreement with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 43.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.305.

(a) In areas specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program under Section 14087.3 and where the department is contracting with a prepaid health plan that is contracting with, governed, owned or operated by a county board of supervisors, a county special commission or county health authority authorized by Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, and
 14087.96, a Medi-Cal or California Work Opportunity and Responsibility for Kids (CalWORKs) applicant or beneficiary shall be informed of the health care options available regarding methods of receiving Medi-Cal benefits. The county shall ensure that each beneficiary is informed of these options and informed that a health care options presentation is available.

(b) The managed care options information described in subdivision (a) shall include the following elements:

(1) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be provided, at a minimum, with the name, address, telephone number, and specialty, if any, of each primary care provider, by specialty, or clinic, participating in each managed care health plan option through a personalized provider directory for that beneficiary or applicant. This information shall be presented under the geographic area designations, by the name of the
 primary care provider and clinic and shall be updated based on information electronically provided monthly by the health care plans to the department, setting forth any changes in the health care plan’s provider network. The geographic areas shall be based on the applicant’s residence address, the minor applicant’s school address, the applicant’s work address, or any other factor deemed appropriate by the department, in consultation with health plan representatives, legislative staff, and consumer stakeholders. In addition, directories of the entire service area of the local initiative and commercial plan provider networks, including, but not limited to, the name, address, and telephone number of each primary care provider and hospital, shall be made available to beneficiaries or applicants who request them from the health care options contractor. Each personalized provider directory shall include information regarding the availability of a directory of the entire service area, provide telephone numbers for
 the beneficiary to request a directory of the entire service area, and include a postage-paid mail card to send for a directory of the entire service area. The personalized provider directory shall be implemented as a pilot project in Los Angeles County pursuant to this article, and in Sacramento County (Geographic Managed Care Model) pursuant to Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089). The content, form, and the geographic areas used in the personalized provider directories shall be determined by the department, in consultation with a workgroup to include health plan representatives, legislative staff, and consumer stakeholders, with an emphasis on the inclusion of stakeholders from Los Angeles and Sacramento Counties. The personalized provider directories may include a section for each health plan. Prior to implementation of the pilot project, the department, in consultation with consumer stakeholders, legislative staff, and health plans, shall determine the parameters, methodology, and evaluation
 process of the pilot project. The pilot project shall thereafter be in effect for a minimum of two years. Following two years of operation as a pilot project in two counties, the department, in consultation with consumer stakeholders, legislative staff, and health plans, shall determine whether to implement personalized provider directories as a permanent program statewide. If necessary, the pilot project shall continue beyond the initial two-year period until this determination is made. This pilot project shall only be implemented to the extent that it is budget neutral to the department.

(2) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that he or she may choose to continue an established patient-provider relationship in a managed care option, if his or her treating provider is a primary care provider or clinic contracting with any of the prepaid health plan options available and has available capacity and agrees to continue to
 treat that beneficiary or applicant.

(3) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that if he or she fails to make a choice, he or she shall be assigned to, and enrolled in, a prepaid health plan.

(c) No later than 30 days following the date a Medi-Cal or CalWORKs beneficiary or applicant is determined eligible for Medi-Cal, the beneficiary shall indicate his or her choice, in writing, from among the available prepaid health plans in the region and his or her choice of primary care provider or clinic contracting with the selected prepaid health plan. Notwithstanding the 30-day deadline set forth in this subdivision, if a beneficiary requests a directory for the entire service area within 30 days of receiving an enrollment form, the deadline for choosing a plan shall be extended an additional 30 days from the date of the request.

(d) At the time the beneficiary or eligible applicant selects a prepaid health plan, the department shall, when applicable, encourage the beneficiary or eligible applicant to also indicate, in writing, his or her choice of primary care provider or clinic contracting with the selected prepaid health plan.

(e) In areas specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program under Section 14087.3, and where the department is contracting with a prepaid health plan that is contracting with, governed, owned or operated by a county board of supervisors, a county special commission or county health authority authorized by Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, and 14087.96, a Medi-Cal or CalWORKs beneficiary who does not make a choice of managed care plans, shall be assigned to and enrolled in an appropriate Medi-Cal prepaid health plan providing
 service within the area in which the beneficiary resides.

(f) If a beneficiary or eligible applicant does not choose a primary care provider or clinic, or does not select any primary care provider who is available, the prepaid health plan that was selected by or assigned to the beneficiary shall ensure that the beneficiary selects a primary care provider or clinic within 30 days after enrollment or is assigned to a primary care provider within 40 days after enrollment.

(g) Any Medi-Cal or CalWORKs beneficiary dissatisfied with the primary care provider or prepaid health plan shall be allowed to select or be assigned to another primary care provider within the same prepaid health plan. In addition, the beneficiary shall be allowed to select or be assigned to another prepaid health plan contracted for pursuant to this article that is in effect for the geographic area in which he or
 she resides, in accordance with Section 1903(m)(2)(F)(ii) of the Social Security Act.

(h) The department or its contractor shall notify a prepaid health plan when it has been selected by or assigned to a beneficiary. The prepaid health plan that has been selected by or assigned to a beneficiary shall notify the primary care provider that has been selected or assigned. The prepaid health plan shall also notify the beneficiary of the prepaid health plan and primary care provider or clinic selected or assigned.

(i) (1) The managed health care plan shall have a valid Medi-Cal contract, adequate capacity, and appropriate staffing to provide health care services to the beneficiary.

(2) The department shall establish standards for all of the following:

(A) The maximum distances a beneficiary is required to travel to obtain primary care services from the managed care plan, in which the beneficiary is enrolled.

(B) The conditions under which a primary care service site shall be accessible by public transportation.

(C) The conditions under which a managed care plan shall provide nonmedical transportation to a primary care service site.

(3) In developing the standards required by paragraph (2) the department shall take into account, on a geographic basis, the means of transportation used and distances typically traveled by Medi-Cal beneficiaries to obtain fee-for-service primary care services and the experience of managed care plans in delivering services to Medi-Cal enrollees. The department shall also
 consider the provider’s ability to render culturally and linguistically appropriate services.

(j) To the extent possible, the arrangements for carrying out subdivision (e) shall provide for the equitable distribution of Medi-Cal beneficiaries among participating prepaid health plans, or managed care plans.

(k) This section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with any federal waiver required to be obtained by the department in order to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 200.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.31.

(a) It is necessary that a special commission be established in the Counties of Tulare and San Joaquin in order to meet the problems of delivery of publicly assisted medical care in the county and to demonstrate ways of promoting quality care and cost efficiency. Because there is no general law under which such a commission could be formed, the adoption of a special act and the formation of a special commission is required.

(b) (1) The Board of
 Supervisors of the County of Tulare and the County of San Joaquin may, for each respective county, by ordinance, establish a commission to negotiate and enter into contracts authorized by Section 14087.3, and to arrange for the provision of health care services provided pursuant to this chapter. If the board of supervisors elects to enact this ordinance, all rights, powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested in a county contracting with the department under this article shall be vested in the county commission.

(2) Health plans operated by the commission may also include, but are not limited to, individuals covered under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (Subchapter XVIII (commencing with Section 1395) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code), individuals and groups entitled to coverage under other publicly supported programs, individuals and groups employed by public agencies or private businesses, and uninsured or
 indigent persons.

(c) The enabling ordinance shall specify the membership of the county commission, the qualifications for individual members, the manner of appointment, selection, or removal of commissioners, and how long they shall serve, and any other matters as the board of supervisors deems necessary or convenient for the conduct of the county commission’s activities. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the county board of supervisors to represent the interests of the public, county, beneficiaries, physicians, hospitals, other health care providers, or other health care organizations. The commission so established shall be considered an entity separate from the county and shall file a statement required by Section 53051 of the Government Code. The commission shall have the power to acquire, possess, and dispose of real or personal property, as may be necessary for the performance of its functions, to employ personnel and
 contract for services required to meet its obligations, to sue or be sued, and to enter into agreements under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Any obligations of a commission, statutory, contractual or otherwise, shall be obligations solely of the commission and shall not be the obligations of the county or of the state.

(d) Upon creation, the commission may borrow from the county, and the county may lend the commission, funds or issue revenue anticipation notes to obtain those funds necessary to commence operations. Prior to commencement of operations, the commission shall be licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(e) In the event a commission may no longer function for the purposes for which it is
 established, at the time as the commission’s then existing obligations have been satisfied or the commission’s assets have been exhausted, the board of supervisors may, by ordinance, terminate the commission.

(f) Prior to the termination of the commission, the board of supervisors shall notify the department of its intent to terminate the commission. The department shall conduct an audit of the commission’s records within 30 days of the notification to determine the liabilities and assets of the commission. The department shall report its findings to the board within 10 days of completion of the audit. The board shall prepare a plan to liquidate or otherwise dispose of the assets of the commission and to pay the liabilities of the commission to the extent of the commission’s assets, and present the plan to the department within 30 days upon receipt of these findings.

(g) Any
 assets of the commission shall be disposed of pursuant to provisions contained in the contract entered into between the state and the commission pursuant to Section 14087.

(h) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that if a commission is formed pursuant to this section, the county shall, with respect to its medical facilities and programs, occupy no greater or lesser status than any other health care provider with similar cost structure and patient population including, but not limited to, considerations of indigent care burden, capital requirements, graduate medical education, and disproportionate share status, in negotiating with the commission for contracts to provide health care services.

(2) Contracts between the department and the commission shall be on a nonbid basis and shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of
 Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to interfere with or limit the commission from giving preference in negotiating to disproportionate share hospitals or other providers of health care to medically indigent or uninsured persons.

(i) Upon termination of the commission by the board, the county shall manage any remaining assets of the commission until superseded by a department approved plan. Any liabilities of the commission shall not become obligations of the county upon either the termination of the commission or the liquidation or disposition of the commission’s remaining assets.

(j) (1) The commission shall be considered a public entity for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(2) The commission, its members, and employees, are protected by the immunities applicable to public entities and public employees governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided by other statutes or regulations that apply expressly to the commission.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a member of the commission shall not be deemed to be interested in a contract entered into by the commission within the meaning of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code if all of the following apply:

(1) The member was appointed to represent the interest of physicians, health care practitioners, hospitals, pharmacies, or other health care organizations.

(2) The contract authorizes the member or the organization the member represents to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the commission’s programs.

(3) The contract contains substantially the same terms and conditions as contracts entered into with other individuals or organizations that the member was appointed to represent.

(4) The member does not influence or attempt to influence the commission or another member of the commission to enter into the contract in which the member is interested.

(5) The member discloses the interest to the commission and abstains from voting on the contract.

(6) The commission notes the member’s disclosure and abstention in its official records and
 authorized the contract in good faith by a vote of its membership sufficient for the purpose without counting the vote of the interested member.

(l) All claims for money or damages against the commission shall be governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided by other statutes or regulations that expressly apply to the commission.

(m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as otherwise provided in this section, a county shall not be liable for any act or omission of the commission.

(n) For the purposes of this section, “commission” means an entity separate from the county that meets the requirements of state and federal law and the quality, cost, and access criteria established by the
 department.

(o) The transfer of responsibility for health care services shall not relieve the county of its responsibility for indigent care pursuant to Section 17000.

(p) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may meet in closed session to consider and take action on matters pertaining to contracts and contract negotiations by commission staff with providers of health care services concerning all matters related to rates of payment.

(q) Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Article 2 (commencing with Section 54340) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, any “peer review body,” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 805 of the
 Business and Professions Code, formed pursuant to the powers granted to the commission authorized by this section, may, at its discretion and without notice to the public, meet in closed session, so long as the purpose of the meeting is the peer review body’s discharge of its responsibility to evaluate and improve the quality of care rendered by health facilities of health practitioners, pursuant to the powers granted the commission. The peer review body and its members shall receive to the fullest extent all immunities, privileges, and protections available to these peer review bodies, their individual members, and persons or entities assisting in the peer review process, including, but not limited to, those afforded by Section 1370 of the Health and Safety Code.

(r) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, both the county and the commission shall be eligible to receive funding under subdivision (p) of Section 14163, and the commission
 shall be considered for all purposes to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (p) of Section 14163.

(s) The commission shall be deemed to be a public agency that is a unit of local government for purposes of all grant programs and other funding and loan guarantee programs.

(t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, those records of the commission and of the county that reveal the rates of payment for health care services or the commission’s deliberative processes, discussions, communications, or any other portion of the negotiations with providers of health care services for rates of payment, shall not be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), or any similar local law requiring disclosure of public records. However, three years after a contract or amendment to a
 contract is fully executed, the portion of the contract or amendment containing the rates of payment shall be open to inspection.

(u) Notwithstanding the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), Article 3 (commencing with Section 11200) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54960) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, or any other provision of state or local law requiring disclosure of public records, those records of the commission and the county that reveal the proceedings of a peer review body, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 805 of the Business and Professions Code, formed pursuant to the powers granted to the commission authorized by this section, shall not be required to be disclosed. The records and proceedings of the peer review body and its
 members shall receive to the fullest extent, all immunities, privileges, and protections available to these records and proceedings, including, but not limited to, those afforded by Section 1157 of the Evidence Code.

(v) (1) Provisions of the Evidence Code, the Government Code, including the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), the Civil Code, the Business and Professions Code, and other applicable law pertaining to the confidentiality of peer review activities of peer review bodies shall apply to the peer review activities of the commission. Peer review proceedings shall constitute an official proceeding authorized by law within the meaning of Section 47 of the Civil Code, and those privileges set forth in that section with respect to official proceedings shall apply to peer review proceedings of the commission. If the commission is
 required by law or contractual obligation to submit to the state or federal government peer review information or information relevant to the credentialing of a participating provider, that submission shall not constitute a waiver of confidentiality. All laws pertaining to the confidentiality of peer review activities shall be construed together as extending, to the extent permitted by law, the maximum degree of protection of confidentiality.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Section 1461 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply to hearings on the reports of hospital medical audit or quality assurance committees as they relate to network providers or applicants.

(w) Except as expressly provided by other provisions of this section, all exemptions and exclusions from disclosure as public records pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, those pertaining to trade secrets and information withheld in the public interest, shall be fully applicable for all state agencies and local agencies with respect to all writings that the commission is required to prepare, produce, or submit pursuant to this section.

(x) (1) The commission may use a computerized management information system in connection with the administration of its health delivery system, including the administration of the state-mandated two-plan Medi-Cal managed care model.

(2) Information maintained in the management information system that pertains to persons who are Medi-Cal applicants or recipients shall be confidential pursuant to Section 14100.2, and shall not be open to examination other than for purposes directly connected with
 the administration of the Medi-Cal program, including, but not limited to, those set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14100.2. This safeguarded information includes, but is not limited to, the names and addresses of recipients, the medical services provided, the social and economic conditions or circumstances of the recipients, an evaluation by the commission of personal information, and medical data, including the diagnosis and past history of disease or disability.

(3) Information maintained in the management information system that pertains to peer review-related activities shall be confidential and subject to the full protections of the law with respect to the confidentiality of activities related to peer review generally.

(y) (1) The records of the commission, whether paper records, records maintained in the management information system, or records
 in any other form, that relate to rates of payment, including records relating to rates of payment determination, allocation or distribution methodologies, formulas or calculations, and records of the health authority that relate to contract negotiations with providers of health care for alternative rates, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) The transmission of the records of the commission, or the information contained therein in an alternative form, to the board of supervisors shall not constitute a waiver of exemption from disclosure, and the records and information, once transmitted to the county board of supervisors, shall be subject to this same exemption. The information, if compelled pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction or administrative body in a manner permitted by law,
 shall be limited to in camera review, and shall not be shared with the parties to the proceeding.

(3) The submission, to the Department of Managed Health Care, of information described in this section for the purpose of obtaining licensure under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or to the State Department of Health Services, shall not constitute a waiver of exemption from disclosure.

(z) (1) (A) Notwithstanding the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the commission may meet in closed session for the purpose of discussion of, or taking action on matters involving, commission trade secrets.

(B) The requirement that the commission make a
 public report of actions taken in closed session and the vote or abstention of every member present may be limited to a brief general description of the action taken and the vote so as to prevent the disclosure of a trade secret.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “commission trade secret” means a trade secret, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, that also meets both of the following criteria:

(i) The secrecy of the information is necessary for the commission to initiate a new service, program, marketing strategy, business plan, or technology, or to add a benefit or product.

(ii) Premature disclosure of the trade secret would create a substantial probability of depriving the commission of a substantial economic benefit or opportunity.

(2) Those records of the commission that reveal the commission’s trade secrets are exempt from disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), or any similar local law requiring the disclosure of public records. This exemption shall apply for a period of two years after the service, program, marketing strategy, business plan, technology, benefit, or product that is the subject of the trade secret is formally adopted by the governing body of the commission, provided that the service, program, marketing strategy, business plan, technology, benefit, or product continues to be a trade secret. The commission may delete the portion or portions containing trade secrets from any documents that were finally approved in the closed session held pursuant to paragraph (1) that are provided to persons who have made the timely or standing request.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the commission from meeting in closed session as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 12.1.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.316.

(a) In lieu of establishing the special commission authorized by Section 14087.31, the county may, itself, negotiate with the department the contract specified in Section 14087.3 and arrange for the provision of health care services provided pursuant to this chapter. If the county elects to exercise this option, subdivisions (p), (q), (t), (u), (v), (w), (x), and (z), of Section 14087.31 shall apply with equal force and effect to the County of Tulare, its board of supervisors and its members, and any advisory commission and its members
 appointed by the board of supervisors to assist with the provision of health care services provided pursuant to this section.

(b) The Tulare County Board of Supervisors shall establish and maintain an advisory commission. The advisory commission shall have a membership that includes beneficiaries, representatives of the community clinics, representatives of hospitals, and physicians. Physician membership shall be nominated by the Tulare County Medical Society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1017, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14087.32.

Commencing on the date the authority first receives Medi-Cal capitated payments for the provision of health care services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and until a commission established pursuant to Section 14087.31 is in compliance with all the requirements regarding tangible net equity applicable to a health care service plan licensed under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The commission may select and
 design its automated management information system. The department, in cooperation with the commission, prior to making capitated payments, shall test the system to ensure that the system is capable of producing detailed, accurate, and timely financial information on the financial condition of the commission, and any other information that is generally required by the department in its contracts with other health care service plans.

(b) In addition to the reports required by the Department of Managed Health Care under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care promulgated thereunder, a commission established pursuant to Section 14087.31 shall provide, on a monthly basis, to the department, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the members of the commission, a copy of the automated report described in subdivision (a) and a
 projection of assets and liabilities, including those that have been incurred but not reported, with an explanation of material increases or decreases in current or projected assets or liabilities. The explanation of increases and decreases in assets or liabilities shall be provided, upon request, to a hospital, independent physicians’ practice association or community clinic, which has contracted with the authority to provide health care services.

(c) In addition to the reporting and notification obligations the commission has under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, the chief executive officer or director of the commission shall immediately notify the department, the Department of Managed Health Care, and the members of the commission, in writing, of any fact or facts that, in the chief executive officer’s or director’s reasonable and prudent judgment, is likely to result in the commission
 being unable to meet its financial obligations to health care providers or to other parties. The written notice shall describe the fact or facts, the anticipated fiscal consequences, and the actions which will be taken to address the anticipated consequences.

(d) The Department of Managed Health Care shall not, in any way, waive or vary, nor shall the department request the Department of Managed Health Care to waive or vary, the tangible net equity requirements for a commission under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, after three years from the date of commencement of capitated payments to the commission. Until the commission is in compliance with all of the tangible net equity requirements under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and the rules of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care adopted thereunder, the commission shall
 develop a stop-loss program appropriate to the risks of the commission, which program shall be satisfactory to both the department and the Department of Managed Health Care.

(e) (1) If the commission votes to file a petition of bankruptcy, or the county board of supervisors notifies the department of its intent to terminate the commission, the department shall immediately transfer the authority’s Medi-Cal beneficiaries as follows:

(A) To other managed care contractors, when available, provided those contractors are able to demonstrate that they can absorb the increased enrollment without detriment to the provision of health care services to their existing enrollees.

(B) To the extent that other managed care contractors are unavailable or the department determines that it is otherwise in the
 best interest of any particular beneficiary, to a fee-for-service reimbursement system pending the availability of managed care contractors provided those contractors are able to demonstrate that they can absorb the increased enrollment without detriment to the provision of health care services to their existing enrollees, or the department determines that providing care to any particular beneficiary pursuant to a fee-for-service reimbursement system is no longer necessary to protect the continuity of care or other interests of the beneficiary.

(2) Beneficiary eligibility for Medi-Cal shall not be affected by actions taken pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Beneficiaries who have been or who are scheduled to be transferred to a fee-for-service reimbursement system or managed care contractor may make a choice to be enrolled in another managed care system, if one is available, in full
 compliance with the federal freedom-of-choice requirements.
